Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA INDEPENDENCE COLLEGE AND COMMUNITY.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for a grant to Minnesota Independence College and Community for need-based scholarships, tuition reduction, institutional support, and exploration and execution for the expansion of programming. Eligibility for scholarships and tuition reduction is limited to resident students, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.101, subdivision 8. new text end